Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1503
Sale of cigarettes; unlawful acts; enumerated.

It shall be unlawful and a violation of sections 59-1501 to 59-1518:

(1) For any retailer, wholesaler or other person with intent to injure competitors or destroy or substantially lessen competition (a) to advertise, offer to sell, or sell, at retail or wholesale, cigarettes at less than cost as defined in sections 59-1501 to 59-1518, to such a retailer or wholesaler, as the case may be, or (b) to offer a rebate in price, to give a rebate in price, to offer a concession of any kind, or to give a concession of any kind or nature whatsoever in connection with the sale of cigarettes, if such rebate or concession offered or given in connection with the sale of cigarettes is not offered or given by the wholesaler or retailer in the same ratio with respect to all other merchandise as to which such rebate or concession may lawfully be given which is sold by such wholesaler or retailer in the ordinary course of his trade or business; Provided, that for the purpose of sections 59-1501 to 59-1518, a so-called tie-in sale of cigarettes, whereby in conjunction with the purchase of cigarettes, at a price which would not otherwise be less than cost to the vendor, the purchaser is offered other merchandise or other thing of value, without charge or at a charge less than the fair and reasonable retail value of such other merchandise or thing of value, such transaction shall be deemed a rebate or concession; or

(2) For any retailer, with intent to injure competitors or destroy or substantially lessen competition, (a) to induce or attempt to induce or to procure or attempt to procure the purchase of cigarettes at a price less than cost to wholesaler as defined in sections 59-1501 to 59-1518, or (b) to induce or attempt to induce or to procure or attempt to procure any rebate or concession of any kind or nature whatsoever in connection with the purchase of cigarettes.

Any retailer or wholesaler or agent thereof who violates the provisions of this section is a disorderly person and shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Evidence of advertisement, offering to sell or sale of cigarettes by any retailer or wholesaler at less than cost to him or evidence of any offer of a rebate in price or the giving of a rebate in price or an offer of a concession or the giving of a concession of any kind or nature whatsoever in connection with the sale of cigarettes, if such rebate or concession offered or given in connection with the sale of cigarettes is not offered or given by the wholesaler or retailer in the same ratio with respect to all other merchandise as to which such rebate or concession may lawfully be given which is sold by such wholesaler or retailer in the ordinary course of his trade or business, or the inducing or attempt to induce or the procuring or the attempt to procure the purchase of cigarettes at a price less than cost to the wholesaler or the retailer shall be prima facie evidence of intent to injure competition and to destroy or substantially lessen competition.

Laws 1965, c. 364, § 3, p. 1186;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 68.